Utah statutes.
20A-1-202.   Date and purpose of local elections.

(1)  A municipal general election shall be held in municipalities and local districts on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year.

(2)  At the municipal general election, the voters shall:

(a) (i)  choose persons to serve as municipal officers; and

(ii)  choose persons to serve as local district officers; and

(b)  approve or reject:

(i)  any proposed initiatives or referenda that have qualified for the ballot as provided by law; and

(ii)  any other ballot propositions submitted to the voters that are authorized by the Utah Code.

